Colorado, session 2026A, HB1312.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-31-101, amend
(1)(v) and (1)(w); and add (1)(x) as follows:
24-31-101. Powers and duties of attorney general - notice to
revisor of statutes - repeal.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(1) The attorney general:
(v) May expend money, manage staff, and perform other
administrative functions essential for the operation of a district attorney's
office when appointed by executive order of the governor; and
(w) May conduct jail assessments in collaboration with the jail
standards advisory committee, created pursuant to section 30-10-530,
pursuant to section 24-31-118; AND
(x) (I) SHALL SUBMIT TO THE PEACE OFFICERS STANDARDS AND
TRAINING BOARD A PROPOSAL BY DECEMBER 31, 2030, TO UPDATE CURRENT
BASIC, RESERVE, AND REFRESHER LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING ACADEMY
PROGRAMS AND IMPROVE THE PEACE OFFICER PERFORMANCE OF FUTURE
ACADEMY GRADUATES. IF THE P.O.S.T. BOARD DOES NOT ACCEPT THE
PROPOSAL, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL SUBMIT A NEW PROPOSAL WITHIN
ONE YEAR AFTER THE DATE THE P.O.S.T. BOARD DID NOT ACCEPT THE
PROPOSAL.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(x) IS REPEALED IF:
(A) THE PEACE OFFICERS STANDARDS AND TRAINING BOARD
APPROVES A COMPREHENSIVE UPDATE TO LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING
ACADEMY PROGRAMS; AND
(B) THE CHAIR OF THE PEACE OFFICERS STANDARDS AND TRAINING
BOARD NOTIFIES THE REVISOR OF STATUTES IN WRITING OF THE DATE WHEN
THE CONDITIONS SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION (1)(x)(II) HAVE OCCURRED
BY EMAILING THE NOTICE TO REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV.
(III) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(x) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE UPON THE
DATE IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(x)(II) OF THIS
SECTION OR, IF THE NOTICE DOES NOT SPECIFY A DATE, UPON THE DATE OF
THE NOTICE TO THE REVISOR OF STATUTES.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-31-302, amend
(3)(a); and add (3)(e) as follows:
24-31-302. Creation of board - members.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1312

(3) (a) The P.O.S.T. board consists of twenty-four TWENTY-EIGHT
members. The chair of the P.O.S.T. board is the attorney general OR THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL'S DESIGNEE, and the board shall annually elect from its
members a vice-chair. THE CHAIR AND VICE-CHAIR MAY SOLICIT
ADDITIONAL EXPERTISE AND PARTICIPATION FROM NONVOTING PERSONS AS
MAY FURTHER THE DUTIES OF THE P.O.S.T. BOARD. The other members shall
be ARE:
(I) The special agent in charge of the Denver division of the federal
bureau of investigation;
(II) The executive director of the department of public safety or the
executive director's designee;
(III) The following members appointed by the governor for terms of
three years:
(A) One local government representative;
(B) Six FIVE active chiefs of police from municipalities of this state
or state institutions of higher education OF WHICH ONE MUST BE FROM AN
URBAN MUNICIPALITY, ONE MUST BE FROM A SUBURBAN MUNICIPALITY, ONE
MUST BE FROM A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY POLICE DEPARTMENT, AND ONE
MUST BE FROM A RURAL MUNICIPALITY, AFTER THE GOVERNOR CONSULTS
WITH A STATEWIDE ORGANIZATION REPRESENTING CHIEFS OF POLICE;
(C) Six FIVE active sheriffs from counties of this state OF WHICH
ONE MUST BE FROM AN URBAN COUNTY, ONE MUST BE FROM A SUBURBAN
COUNTY, AND ONE MUST BE FROM A RURAL COUNTY, AFTER THE GOVERNOR
CONSULTS WITH A STATEWIDE ORGANIZATION REPRESENTING SHERIFFS;
(D) Three SIX active peace officers with a rank of sergeant or below,
and AFTER THE GOVERNOR CONSULTS WITH A STATEWIDE ORGANIZATION
REPRESENTING LINE-LEVEL PEACE OFFICERS;
(E) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A STATEWIDE ORGANIZATION
REPRESENTING PEACE OFFICERS WITH A RANK OF SERGEANT OR BELOW;
(F) TWO ACTIVE P.O.S.T.-CERTIFIED PEACE OFFICERS WITH A
NONEXECUTIVE RANK FROM STATE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES;
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1312

(E) (G) Five THREE non-law-enforcement members. The
non-law-enforcement members shall complete a citizens' law enforcement
academy prior to appointment or within one year after appointment.
(H) ONE TRAINING ACADEMY DIRECTOR REPRESENTING A
COMMUNITY-COLLEGE-OPERATED PEACE OFFICER TRAINING ACADEMY;
(I) ONE TRAINING ACADEMY DIRECTOR REPRESENTING A
LAW-ENFORCEMENT-OPERATED PEACE OFFICER TRAINING ACADEMY; AND
(J) ONE EXECUTIVE FROM AN ORGANIZATION REPRESENTING RESERVE
PEACE OFFICERS.
(e) A PERSON WHO HAS HAD THEIR P.O.S.T. CERTIFICATION REVOKED
SHALL NOT BE APPOINTED TO SERVE ON THE P.O.S.T. BOARD.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-31-303, add (7) as
follows:
24-31-303. Duties - powers of the P.O.S.T. board - instructors -
definition.
(7) IN CARRYING OUT ITS DUTIES PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF
THIS SECTION, THE P.O.S.T. BOARD SHALL NOT APPROVE AS A SKILLS
INSTRUCTOR A PERSON WHOSE PEACE OFFICER CERTIFICATION HAS BEEN
REVOKED BY THE P.O.S.T. BOARD AND SHALL NOT APPROVE A TRAINING
ACADEMY IF AN INSTRUCTOR OF THE TRAINING ACADEMY IS A PERSON
WHOSE PEACE OFFICER CERTIFICATION HAS BEEN REVOKED BY THE P.O.S.T.
BOARD AFTER SEPTEMBER 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-31-305, amend
(1)(a) introductory portion, (1)(a)(III), and (1)(a)(IV); and add (1)(a)(V) as
follows:
24-31-305. Certification - issuance - renewal - revocation - rules
- definition.
(1) (a) Basic peace officer certification requirements shall MUST
include:
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1312

(III) Passage of examinations administered by the P.O.S.T. board;
and
(IV) Current first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation certificates
or their equivalents; AND
(V) THAT THE CERTIFIED PEACE OFFICER IS AT LEAST TWENTY-ONE
YEARS OLD OR OLDER.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 24-31-322 as
follows:
24-31-322. Authority to receive training or grants.
A TRAINING ACADEMY FULL-TIME INSTRUCTOR IS ELIGIBLE TO
ATTEND P.O.S.T. CERTIFICATION CLASSES THAT ARE FUNDED OR HOSTED
USING GRANT FUNDING, BUT ARE NOT ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE INDIVIDUAL
GRANT FUNDING FROM THE P.O.S.T. BOARD. THIS SECTION DOES NOT
PROHIBIT A TRAINING ACADEMY FULL-TIME INSTRUCTOR FROM RECEIVING
INDIVIDUAL GRANT FUNDING FROM AN ENTITY THAT IS NOT THE P.O.S.T.
BOARD.
SECTION 6. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1312

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1312